Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
CHAPTER 236 Boiler and Pressure Vessel Safety
236.120.
Certificate of inspection — Fee — Term — Posting — Termination — Suspension — Reissuance.

If, upon inspection, a boiler or pressure vessel is found to comply with the administrative regulations of the department, the owner, user, or insurance company of it shall pay to the department the sum of fifteen dollars ($15). When the inspection is made by a special inspector, the inspector shall attach the certificate fee to his or her report. The chief boiler inspector, or his or her duly authorized representative, shall issue to the owner or user a certificate of inspection for the boiler or pressure vessel bearing the date of inspection and specifying the maximum pressure under which the boiler or pressure vessel may be operated. An inspection certificate shall be valid for not more than fourteen (14) months from its date in the case of power boilers, and twenty-six (26) months in the case of low pressure steam or vapor heating boilers, hot water heating boilers, or hot water supply boilers. The most recently issued certificate of inspection shall be posted in the room containing the boiler inspected or, in the case of a portable boiler, shall be kept in a tool box accompanying the boiler. The most recently issued certificate of inspection for each pressure vessel shall be kept in the owner’s files.

No certificate of inspection issued for an insured boiler, inspected by a special inspector, shall be valid after the insurance on the boiler for which it was issued terminates. Boilers shall be insured by a company duly authorized by this state to carry the insurance.

The commissioner or his or her authorized representative may at any time suspend a certificate of inspection if, in his or her opinion, the boiler or pressure vessel for which it was issued cannot be operated without menace to the public safety, or if the boiler or pressure vessel is found not in compliance with this chapter or the administrative regulations of the department. A special boiler inspector shall have corresponding powers with respect to suspending certificates of inspection for boilers or pressure vessels insured by the company employing him or her. The suspension of a certificate of inspection shall continue in effect until the boiler or pressure vessel conforms to this chapter and administrative regulations of the department, and until the inspection certificate is reinstated.

A suspended certificate of inspection shall be reissued on the recommendation of the boiler inspector or special boiler inspector who first caused the suspension or at the discretion of the chief boiler inspector.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 89, § 12; 1980, ch. 207, § 13, effective July 15, 1980; 1994, ch. 2, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2010, ch. 24, § 525, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 14, § 13, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 169, § 95, effective June 29, 2017.

236.130.
Inspection fees — Administrative regulations — Fund.

The owner or user of a boiler or pressure vessel required by this chapter to be inspected shall pay to the department, upon completion of inspection, reasonable fees not to exceed the cost of inspection as established by the commissioner in an administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

All other inspections, including shop inspections and inspection of secondhand or used boilers made by the boiler inspector shall be charged for at the rate set by administrative regulation promulgated by the commissioner in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

All fees received by the department shall be held in a trust and agency fund from which the expenses of administering this chapter and other department responsibilities may be paid, and no portion of the fund shall lapse into the general fund at the end of each fiscal year.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 89, § 14; 1980, ch. 207, § 14, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 127, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2010, ch. 24, § 526, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 96, effective June 29, 2017.

236.140.
Inspector’s bond. [Repealed.]

236.150.
Appeal to commissioner — Judicial review.

Any person aggrieved by an order or act of a boiler inspector, under this chapter, may, within fifteen (15) days of notice thereof, appeal from the order or act to the commissioner who shall schedule and conduct an administrative hearing in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

Any person aggrieved by a final order of the commissioner may file a petition in the Franklin Circuit Court for judicial review in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 89, § 16; 1968, ch. 152, § 128; 1980, ch. 207, § 15, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 318, § 155, effective July 15, 1996; 2010, ch. 24, § 527, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 14, § 14, effective July 12, 2012.

236.210.
License required for installing, erecting, or repairing boilers or pressure vessels — Issuance — Renewal — Exception.

A person shall not engage in the business of installing, erecting, or repairing boilers or pressure vessels unless that person first obtains a license from the commissioner.

Each person, firm, or corporation shall pass an examination prepared and administered by the department.

A license shall be issued by the commissioner or the chief boiler inspector to qualified applicants upon payment of a reasonable fee not to exceed the cost of examination and other expenses involved as established by the commissioner in an administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

The license shall be renewable annually, not later than the first of the month following the expiration date, upon payment of a reasonable fee not to exceed the costs involved in such renewal as established by the commissioner in an administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

All individuals in the employ of a licensee shall not be required to be licensed.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 209, § 2; 1980, ch. 207, § 16, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 127, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 2003, ch. 77, § 2, effective June 24, 2003; 2010, ch. 24, § 528, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 14, § 15, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 169, § 97, effective June 29, 2017.

236.220.
Procedure for suspension or revocation of license.

A license issued under KRS

236.210

to

236.260

may be suspended or revoked for falsification of any information contained in the application. Written notice of a suspension shall be given to the licensee by the chief boiler inspector within ten (10) days of the first notification of the violation. A person whose license has been suspended may appeal to the department, and a hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

If the department has reason to believe that a licensee is no longer qualified to hold a license, the department shall hold a hearing to be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. If, as a result of the hearing, the department finds that the licensee is no longer qualified to hold a license, the department shall state in a final order that the license is revoked or suspended.

A person whose license has been suspended may apply for reinstatement of the license after ninety (90) days from the date of the suspension.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 209, § 3; 1980, ch. 207, § 17, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 318, § 156, effective July 15, 1996; 2017 ch. 169, § 98, effective June 29, 2017.

236.230.
Reissue of lost or destroyed license.

If a license is lost or destroyed, a new license shall be issued in its place, without submitting another application, upon request and payment of a fee of five dollars ($5).

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 209, § 4.

236.240.
Permit required for installation, erection, or repair — Fees.

A person shall not install, erect, or make repairs affecting the strength of a boiler or pressure vessel without first securing a permit from the department. Permits shall be issued only to a person licensed under KRS

236.210

to

236.260

.

No work shall be performed except by or under the supervision of a licensed person. The permit fees shall be set by the department.

The permit fees shall include one (1) interim inspection and one (1) final inspection for issuance of a boiler or pressure vessel certificate of inspection.

Special inspections and more than two (2) inspections requested by the licensee for each permit shall be charged fees in accordance with KRS

236.130

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 209, § 5; 1980, ch. 207, § 18, effective July 15, 1980; 2010, ch. 24, § 529, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 14, § 16, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 169, § 99, effective June 29, 2017.

236.250.
Exceptions to permit requirements — Payment of permit to repair fees — Emergency repairs.

A person shall not make repairs affecting the strength or safety of boilers or pressure vessels without first securing a permit from the department unless repairs have been authorized by a boiler inspector or special boiler inspector pending issuance of the permit or unless such repairs are emergency repairs authorized by the department, a special boiler inspector or a boiler inspector pending issuance of the permit. A permit shall not be required for emergency items not affecting the strength of the boiler or pressure vessel, when performed by qualified welders regularly employed by firms utilizing properly qualified welding procedures. Permits shall only be issued to persons licensed under this chapter. A permit fee shall be paid directly to the department, and shall accompany the repair application.

Payment of permit to repair fees shall be required from operating companies performing pressure vessel repairs in accordance with the National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors inspection code and utilizing properly qualified welding procedures and regularly employing qualified welders to weld on boilers owned and operated by such firm.

For emergency repairs authorized by a boiler inspector or special boiler inspector, a repair permit shall be obtained and filed with the department within thirty (30) days of repair completion.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 209, § 6; 1980, ch. 207, § 19, effective July 15, 1980; 2010, ch. 24, § 530, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 14, § 17, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 169, § 100, effective June 29, 2017.

236.260.
Access to premises.

The commissioner, the chief boiler inspector, any boiler inspector, or any special boiler inspector shall have free access, during reasonable hours, to any premises in the state where a boiler or pressure vessel is being constructed, operated, installed, or repaired for the purpose of ascertaining whether the work being performed is in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 236 or any orders or regulations made thereunder.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 209, § 7; 1980, ch. 207, § 20, effective July 15, 1980; 2010, ch. 24, § 531, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 14, § 18, effective July 12, 2012.

236.990.
Penalties.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, or corporation to operate in this state a boiler or pressure vessel without a valid certificate of inspection. The operation of a boiler or pressure vessel without a valid certificate, or at a pressure exceeding that specified in an inspection certificate, shall constitute a Class B misdemeanor on the part of the owner, user, or operator. Each day of unlawful operation shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person who violates any provision of KRS 236.040(1); 236.080(4); 236.110(1), (4) and (5); 236.210(1); 236.220(1); 236.240(1) and (2); 236.250(1); or any proper order or administrative regulation made or promulgated thereunder; or who hinders or obstructs an authorized inspector in the performance of his or her duties under this chapter, shall be subject to the penalties in subsection (1) of this section.

Any person who willfully violates any provision of this chapter, or any administrative regulation, emergency order, order of the state fire marshal, order of an authorized deputy state fire marshal, order of the chief boiler inspector, or order of any authorized boiler inspector, promulgated or made pursuant to this chapter, shall be subject to suspension or revocation of any appointment, commission, certification, registration, license, or permit made or issued by the department and held by that person, in accordance with the procedures specified in KRS

236.220

, or in lieu of a suspension or revocation, shall be subject to an administrative fine of not less than ten dollars ($10) and not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) after notice and hearing by the department in accordance with KRS

236.220

. Each day these violations exist shall, in the discretion of the department, be considered as a separate violation.

As an aid to enforcement of this chapter, or of any administrative regulation or order relating thereto, the department or chief boiler inspector may take any administrative action or bring any authorized legal action designed to prevent or correct any condition constituting or threatening to constitute a violation of any provision of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 89, § 13; 1980, ch. 207, §§ 21, 22, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 318, § 157, effective July 15, 1996; 2010, ch. 24, § 532, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 14, § 19, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 169, § 101, effective June 29, 2017.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Designation of offenses; penalties, see KRS

532.020

.